Illinois, session 104th, HB4570.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Children and Family Services Act is amended 5by changing Section 35.7 as follows: 6    (20 ILCS 505/35.7)7    Sec. 35.7. Strengthening Best Practices Error Reduction 8Implementations Plans; Inspector General.9    (a) The Inspector General of the Department of Children 10and Family Services shall develop Strengthening Best Practices 11Error Reduction Implementation Plans, as necessary, informed 12by principles of safety science, for the purpose of reducing 13child fatalities and serious harm. These plans shall be guided 14by patterns, findings, and recommendations, to remedy patterns 15of errors or problematic practices that compromise or threaten 16the safety of children as identified in the DCFS Office of the 17Inspector General (OIG) death or serious injury investigations 18and Child Death Review Teams recommendations. The 19Strengthening Best Practices Plans shall address the systemic 20and organizational conditions that contribute to child 21fatalities and serious harm. The Error Reduction 22Implementation Plans shall include both training and on-site 23components. The Inspector General shall submit proposed   HB4570- 2 -LRB104 16809 KTG 30218 b1Strengthening Best Practices Error Reduction Implementation 2Plans to the Director for review. The Director may approve the 3plans submitted, or approve plans amended by the Office of the 4Inspector General, taking into consideration policies and 5procedures that govern the function and performance of any 6affected frontline staff. The Director shall document the 7basis for disapproval of any submitted or amended plan. The 8Strengthening Best Practices Plans shall include compliance 9provisions, which specify methods for implementing, 10monitoring, and evaluating recommendations. The Department 11shall deploy Error Reduction Safety Teams to implement the 12Error Reduction Implementation Plans. The Error Reduction 13Safety Teams shall be composed of Quality Assurance and 14Division of Training staff to implement hands-on training and 15Error Reduction Implementation Plans. The teams shall work in 16the offices of the Department or of agencies, or both, as 17required by the Error Reduction Implementation Plans, and 18shall work to ensure that systems are in place to continue 19reform efforts after the departure of the teams. The Director 20shall develop a method to ensure consistent compliance with 21any Error Reduction Implementation Plans, the provisions of 22which shall be incorporated into the plan.23    (b) (Blank). Quality Assurance shall prepare public 24reports annually detailing the following: the substance of any 25Error Reduction Implementation Plan approved; any deviations 26from the Error Reduction Plan; whether adequate staff was   HB4570- 3 -LRB104 16809 KTG 30218 b1available to perform functions necessary to the Error 2Reduction Implementation Plan, including identification and 3reporting of any staff needs; other problems noted or barriers 4to implementing the Error Reduction Implementation Plan; and 5recommendations for additional training, amendments to rules 6and procedures, or other systemic reform identified by the 7teams. Quality Assurance shall work with affected frontline 8staff to implement provisions of the approved Error Reduction 9Implementation Plans related to staff function and 10performance.11    (c) The OIG, in collaboration with the Department, Error 12Reduction Teams shall implement training and reform protocols 13through incubating change in each region, Department office, 14or Child Welfare Contributing Agency purchase of service 15office, as required. The teams shall administer hands-on 16assistance, supervision, and management while ensuring that 17the office, region, or agency develops the skills and systems 18necessary to incorporate changes on a permanent basis. For 19each Error Reduction Implementation Plan, the Team shall 20determine whether adequate staff is available to fulfill the 21Error Reduction Implementation Plan, provide case-by-case 22supervision to ensure that the plan is implemented, and ensure 23that management puts systems in place to enable the reforms to 24continue. Error Reduction Teams shall work with affected 25frontline staff to ensure that provisions of the approved 26Error Reduction Implementation Plans relating to staff   HB4570- 4 -LRB104 16809 KTG 30218 b1functions and performance are achieved to effect necessary 2reforms.3    (d) The OIG shall develop and submit new Strengthening 4Best Practices Error Reduction Implementation Plans as 5necessary. To implement each Strengthening Best Practices 6Error Reduction Implementation Plan, as approved by the 7Director, the OIG shall work with staff Quality Assurance 8members of the Error Reduction Teams designated by the 9Department to deliver the training curriculum. The teams shall 10be comprised of staff from Quality Assurance and Training. 11Training shall work with the OIG and with the child death 12review teams to develop a curriculum to address errors 13identified that compromise the safety of children. Following 14the training roll-out, the Teams shall work on-site in 15identified offices. The Teams shall review and supervise all 16work relevant to the Error Reduction Implementation Plan. 17Quality Assurance shall identify outcome measures and track 18compliance with the training curriculum. Each quarter, Quality 19Assurance shall prepare a report detailing compliance with the 20Error Reduction Implementation Plan and alert the Director to 21staffing needs or other needs to accomplish the goals of the 22Error Reduction Implementation Plan. The report shall be 23transmitted to the Director, the OIG, and all management staff 24involved in the Error Reduction Implementation Plan.25    (e) The OIG shall include a review of the implementation 26and evaluation of the Strengthening Best Practices Plans from   HB4570- 5 -LRB104 16809 KTG 30218 b1the previous fiscal year, as necessary, in the OIG Annual 2Report provided to the General Assembly and Governor in 3accordance with subsection (h) of Section 35.5. The Director 4shall review quarterly Quality Assurance reports and determine 5adherence to the Error Reduction Implementation Plan using 6criteria and standards developed by the Department.7(Source: P.A. 100-863, eff. 8-14-18.)